Washington statutes.
RCW 11.90.030

Foreign country treatment.

A court of this state may treat a foreign country as if it were a state for the purpose of applying this chapter.

[ 2009 c 81 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2009 c 81: See note following RCW 11.90.010.